Hawaii statutes.
[§602-60] Subpoenas; oaths. The
intermediate appellate court shall have the power to subpoena and compel the
attendance of witnesses from any part of the State and to compel the production
of books, papers, documents, or tangible things. Any judge of the intermediate
appellate court may administer oaths. [L 2008, c 148, §1; am L 2010, c 93, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next